Nebraska, session 109, LB489.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB489 LB489
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 70-1012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
70-1012 (1) Before any electric generation facilities or any
transmission lines or related facilities carrying more than seven hundred
volts are constructed or acquired by an electric any supplier as defined
in section 70-1001.01, an application, filed with the board and
containing such information as the board shall prescribe, shall be
approved by the board, except that such approval shall not be required
(a) for the construction or acquisition of a transmission line extension
or related facilities within a supplier's own service area or for the
construction or acquisition of a line not exceeding one-half mile outside
its own service area when all owners of electric lines located within
one-half mile of the extension consent thereto in writing and such
consents are filed with the board, (b) for any generation facility when
the board finds that (i) such facility is being constructed or acquired
to replace a generating plant owned by an individual municipality or
registered group of municipalities with a capacity not greater than that
of the plant being replaced, (ii) such facility will generate less than
twenty-five thousand kilowatts of electric energy at rated capacity, and
(iii) the applicant will not use the plant or transmission capacity to
supply wholesale power to customers outside the applicant's existing
retail service area or chartered territory, (c) for acquisition of
transmission lines or related facilities, within the state, carrying one
hundred fifteen thousand volts or less, if the current owner of the
transmission lines or related facilities notifies the board of the lines
or facilities involved in the transaction and the parties to the
transaction, or (d) for the construction of a qualified facility as
defined in section 70-2002.
(2)(a) Before any electric supplier commences construction of or
acquires an electric generation facility or transmission lines or related
facilities carrying more than seven hundred volts that will be located
-2-

LB489 LB489
2025 2025
within a ten-mile radius of a military installation, the owner of such
proposed facility, transmission lines, or related facilities shall
provide written notice certifying to the board that such facility or
facilities contain no materials, electronics, or other components
manufactured by any foreign government or foreign nongovernment person
determined to be a foreign adversary pursuant to 15 C.F.R. 791.4 7.4.
(b) Any electric supplier supplying, producing, or distributing
electricity within the state for sale at retail is exempt from
subdivision (a) of this subsection if it is in compliance with the
critical infrastructure protection requirements issued by the North
American Electric Reliability Corporation. To receive such exemption, the
electric supplier shall submit written notice to the board certifying
that it is in such compliance. The electric supplier shall also submit
written notice to the board at any time such supplier is no longer in
such compliance.
(3) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
(4) An entity that is not a public power district organized under
Chapter 70, article 6, a public power and irrigation district, a
municipality, a registered group of municipalities, an electric
cooperative, an electric membership association, a joint entity formed
under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, a joint public agency formed under
the Joint Public Agency Act, an agency formed under the Municipal
Cooperative Financing Act, or any other governmental entity providing
electric service shall be prohibited from operating, maintaining,
constructing, or acquiring any transmission line or related facility
carrying more than seven hundred volts within the state. This subsection
shall not apply to any transmission lines operated, maintained,
constructed, or acquired within the state prior to the effective date of
this act.
Sec. 2. Original section 70-1012, Revised Statutes Cumulative
-3-

LB489 LB489
2025 2025
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-